Illinois, session 104th, HB2628.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Employees Group Insurance Act of 1971 5is amended by changing Section 6.11 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 375/6.11)7    Sec. 6.11. Required health benefits; Illinois Insurance 8Code requirements. The program of health benefits shall 9provide the post-mastectomy care benefits required to be 10covered by a policy of accident and health insurance under 11Section 356t of the Illinois Insurance Code. The program of 12health benefits shall provide the coverage required under 13Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 14356w, 356x, 356z.2, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 15356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 16356z.17, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 17356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 18356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.55, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 19356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, and 20356z.70, and 356z.71, 356z.74, 356z.76, 356z.77, and 356z.80 21of the Illinois Insurance Code. The program of health benefits 22must comply with Sections 155.22a, 155.37, 355b, 356z.19, 23370c, and 370c.1 and Article XXXIIB of the Illinois Insurance   HB2628- 2 -LRB104 11962 BAB 22055 b1Code. The program of health benefits shall provide the 2coverage required under Section 356m of the Illinois Insurance 3Code and, for the employees of the State Employee Group 4Insurance Program only, the coverage as also provided in 5Section 6.11B of this Act. The Department of Insurance shall 6enforce the requirements of this Section with respect to 7Sections 370c and 370c.1 of the Illinois Insurance Code; all 8other requirements of this Section shall be enforced by the 9Department of Central Management Services.10    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 11any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 12with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 13Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 14Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 15whatever reason, is unauthorized. 16(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 17102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 181-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-768, 19eff. 1-1-24; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 20102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 211-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-8, eff. 1-1-24; 103-84, 22eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 23103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 248-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, 25eff. 8-2-24; 103-870, eff. 1-1-25; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 26103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-951, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff.   HB2628- 3 -LRB104 11962 BAB 22055 b11-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 2    Section 10. The Counties Code is amended by changing 3Section 5-1069.3 as follows: 4    (55 ILCS 5/5-1069.3)5    Sec. 5-1069.3. Required health benefits. If a county, 6including a home rule county, is a self-insurer for purposes 7of providing health insurance coverage for its employees, the 8coverage shall include coverage for the post-mastectomy care 9benefits required to be covered by a policy of accident and 10health insurance under Section 356t and the coverage required 11under Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 12356u.10, 356w, 356x, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 13356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.22, 14356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 15356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.51, 16356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 17356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, and 356z.70, and 356z.71, 18356z.74, 356z.77, and 356z.80 of the Illinois Insurance Code. 19The coverage shall comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, 20356z.19, and 370c of the Illinois Insurance Code. The 21Department of Insurance shall enforce the requirements of this 22Section. The requirement that health benefits be covered as 23provided in this Section is an exclusive power and function of 24the State and is a denial and limitation under Article VII,   HB2628- 4 -LRB104 11962 BAB 22055 b1Section 6, subsection (h) of the Illinois Constitution. A home 2rule county to which this Section applies must comply with 3every provision of this Section. 4    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 5any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 6with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 7Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 8Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 9whatever reason, is unauthorized. 10(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 11102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 121-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, 13eff. 1-1-23; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 14102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 151-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 16eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 17103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 187-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, 19eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 20revised 11-26-24.) 21    Section 15. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 22changing Section 10-4-2.3 as follows: 23    (65 ILCS 5/10-4-2.3)24    Sec. 10-4-2.3. Required health benefits. If a   HB2628- 5 -LRB104 11962 BAB 22055 b1municipality, including a home rule municipality, is a 2self-insurer for purposes of providing health insurance 3coverage for its employees, the coverage shall include 4coverage for the post-mastectomy care benefits required to be 5covered by a policy of accident and health insurance under 6Section 356t and the coverage required under Sections 356g, 7356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 356w, 356x, 8356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 9356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 10356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 11356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 12356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 13356z.67, 356z.68, and 356z.70, and 356z.71, 356z.74, 356z.77, 14and 356z.80 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The coverage shall 15comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, 356z.19, and 370c of the 16Illinois Insurance Code. The Department of Insurance shall 17enforce the requirements of this Section. The requirement that 18health benefits be covered as provided in this is an exclusive 19power and function of the State and is a denial and limitation 20under Article VII, Section 6, subsection (h) of the Illinois 21Constitution. A home rule municipality to which this Section 22applies must comply with every provision of this Section. 23    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 24any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 25with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 26Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on   HB2628- 6 -LRB104 11962 BAB 22055 b1Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 2whatever reason, is unauthorized. 3(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 4102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 51-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, 6eff. 1-1-23; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 7102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 81-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 9eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 10103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 117-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, 12eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 13revised 11-26-24.) 14    Section 20. The School Code is amended by changing Section 1510-22.3f as follows: 16    (105 ILCS 5/10-22.3f)17    Sec. 10-22.3f. Required health benefits. Insurance 18protection and benefits for employees shall provide the 19post-mastectomy care benefits required to be covered by a 20policy of accident and health insurance under Section 356t and 21the coverage required under Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 22356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 356w, 356x, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 23356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 24356z.15, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32,   HB2628- 7 -LRB104 11962 BAB 22055 b1356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 2356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 3356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, and 356z.70, and 4356z.71, 356z.74, 356z.77, and 356z.80 of the Illinois 5Insurance Code. Insurance policies shall comply with Section 6356z.19 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The coverage shall 7comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, and 370c of the Illinois 8Insurance Code. The Department of Insurance shall enforce the 9requirements of this Section. 10    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 11any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 12with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 13Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 14Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 15whatever reason, is unauthorized. 16(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 17102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 181-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-804, 19eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 20102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 211-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, 22eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 23103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, eff. 247-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, 25eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 11-26-24.)   HB2628- 8 -LRB104 11962 BAB 22055 b1    Section 25. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 2adding Section 356z.80 as follows: 3    (215 ILCS 5/356z.80 new)4    Sec. 356z.80. Coverage of treatment for stuttering. 5    (a) As used in this Section:6    "Habilitative services" means health care services that 7help a person keep, learn, or improve skills and functioning 8for daily living.9    "Habilitative speech therapy" means speech therapy that 10helps a person keep, learn, or improve skills and functioning 11for daily living.12    "Rehabilitative services" means health care services that 13help a person restore or improve skills and functioning for 14daily living that have been lost or impaired.15    "Rehabilitative speech therapy" means speech therapy that 16helps a person restore or improve skills and functioning for 17daily living that have been lost or impaired.18    (b) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this Section, 19a group or individual policy of accident and health insurance 20or a managed care plan that is amended, delivered, issued, or 21renewed on or after January 1, 2027 that provides coverage 22for:23        (1) habilitative services shall provide coverage for 24    habilitative speech therapy as a treatment for stuttering, 25    regardless of whether the stuttering is classified as   HB2628- 9 -LRB104 11962 BAB 22055 b1    developmental;2        (2) rehabilitative services shall provide coverage for 3    rehabilitative speech therapy as a treatment for 4    stuttering; or5        (3) both habilitative services and rehabilitative 6    services shall provide the coverage required under 7    paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection.8    (c) The coverage required under subsection (b) of this 9Section shall:10        (1) not be:11            (A) subject to any maximum annual benefit limit, 12        including any limits on the number of visits an 13        insured may make to a speech-language pathologist;14            (B) limited based on the type of disease, injury, 15        disorder, or other medical condition that resulted in 16        the stuttering; or17            (C) subject to utilization review or utilization 18        management requirements, including prior 19        authorization;20        (2) be considered medically necessary if the patient's 21    treating provider determines, in his or her clinical 22    judgment, that such speech therapy services for stuttering 23    are medically appropriate to help the patient keep, learn, 24    improve, or restore skills or functioning for daily 25    living; and 26        (3) include coverage for speech therapy provided in   HB2628- 10 -LRB104 11962 BAB 22055 b1    person and via telehealth, which shall:2            (A) not be less than the coverage required for 3        health benefit plans under Section 356z.22; and4            (B) include the use of any communication 5        technology, application, or platform to deliver 6        telehealth services, except coverage may be restricted 7        to technology, applications, or platforms that are 8        compliant with any applicable privacy provisions of 9        the federal Health Insurance Portability and 10        Accountability Act of 1996, 42 U.S.C. 1320d et seq., 11        as amended.12    (d) If, at any time, the Secretary of the United States 13Department of Health and Human Services, or its successor 14agency, promulgates rules or regulations to be published in 15the Federal Register or publishes a comment in the Federal 16Register or issues an opinion, guidance, or other action that 17would require the State, pursuant to any provision of the 18Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 19111-148), including, but not limited to, 42 U.S.C. 2018031(d)(3)(B) or any successor provision, to defray the cost 21of any coverage outlined in this Section, then this Section is 22inoperative with respect to all coverage outlined in this 23Section other than that authorized under Section 1902 of the 24Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. 1396a, and the State shall not 25assume any obligation for the cost of the coverage set forth in 26this Section.   HB2628- 11 -LRB104 11962 BAB 22055 b1    Section 30. The Health Maintenance Organization Act is 2amended by changing Section 5-3 as follows: 3    (215 ILCS 125/5-3)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1411.2)4    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-808)5    Sec. 5-3. Insurance Code provisions. 6    (a) Health Maintenance Organizations shall be subject to 7the provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 8141.1, 141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 9152, 153, 154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.22a, 10155.49, 352c, 355.2, 355.3, 355.6, 355b, 355c, 356f, 356g.5-1, 11356m, 356q, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356z.2, 356z.3a, 12356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.10, 13356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.17, 356z.18, 14356z.19, 356z.20, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.23, 356z.24, 356z.25, 15356z.26, 356z.28, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.31, 356z.32, 356z.33, 16356z.34, 356z.35, 356z.36, 356z.37, 356z.38, 356z.39, 356z.40, 17356z.40a, 356z.41, 356z.44, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 18356z.48, 356z.49, 356z.50, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.55, 19356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.58, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 20356z.63, 356z.64, 356z.65, 356z.66, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.69, 21356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.72, 356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 356z.77, 22356z.80, 364, 364.01, 364.3, 367.2, 367.2-5, 367i, 368a, 368b, 23368c, 368d, 368e, 370c, 370c.1, 401, 401.1, 402, 403, 403A, 24408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, and 444.1, paragraph (c) of   HB2628- 12 -LRB104 11962 BAB 22055 b1subsection (2) of Section 367, and Articles IIA, VIII 1/2, 2XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, XXVI, and XXXIIB of the 3Illinois Insurance Code.4    (b) For purposes of the Illinois Insurance Code, except 5for Sections 444 and 444.1 and Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, 6Health Maintenance Organizations in the following categories 7are deemed to be "domestic companies":8        (1) a corporation authorized under the Dental Service 9    Plan Act or the Voluntary Health Services Plans Act;10        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of this 11    State; or12        (3) a corporation organized under the laws of another 13    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 14    of this State, except a corporation subject to 15    substantially the same requirements in its state of 16    organization as is a "domestic company" under Article VIII 17    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.18    (c) In considering the merger, consolidation, or other 19acquisition of control of a Health Maintenance Organization 20pursuant to Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code,21        (1) the Director shall give primary consideration to 22    the continuation of benefits to enrollees and the 23    financial conditions of the acquired Health Maintenance 24    Organization after the merger, consolidation, or other 25    acquisition of control takes effect;26        (2)(i) the criteria specified in subsection (1)(b) of   HB2628- 13 -LRB104 11962 BAB 22055 b1    Section 131.8 of the Illinois Insurance Code shall not 2    apply and (ii) the Director, in making his determination 3    with respect to the merger, consolidation, or other 4    acquisition of control, need not take into account the 5    effect on competition of the merger, consolidation, or 6    other acquisition of control;7        (3) the Director shall have the power to require the 8    following information:9            (A) certification by an independent actuary of the 10        adequacy of the reserves of the Health Maintenance 11        Organization sought to be acquired;12            (B) pro forma financial statements reflecting the 13        combined balance sheets of the acquiring company and 14        the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 15        acquired as of the end of the preceding year and as of 16        a date 90 days prior to the acquisition, as well as pro 17        forma financial statements reflecting projected 18        combined operation for a period of 2 years;19            (C) a pro forma business plan detailing an 20        acquiring party's plans with respect to the operation 21        of the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 22        acquired for a period of not less than 3 years; and23            (D) such other information as the Director shall 24        require.25    (d) The provisions of Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois 26Insurance Code and this Section 5-3 shall apply to the sale by   HB2628- 14 -LRB104 11962 BAB 22055 b1any health maintenance organization of greater than 10% of its 2enrollee population (including, without limitation, the health 3maintenance organization's right, title, and interest in and 4to its health care certificates).5    (e) In considering any management contract or service 6agreement subject to Section 141.1 of the Illinois Insurance 7Code, the Director (i) shall, in addition to the criteria 8specified in Section 141.2 of the Illinois Insurance Code, 9take into account the effect of the management contract or 10service agreement on the continuation of benefits to enrollees 11and the financial condition of the health maintenance 12organization to be managed or serviced, and (ii) need not take 13into account the effect of the management contract or service 14agreement on competition.15    (f) Except for small employer groups as defined in the 16Small Employer Rating, Renewability and Portability Health 17Insurance Act and except for medicare supplement policies as 18defined in Section 363 of the Illinois Insurance Code, a 19Health Maintenance Organization may by contract agree with a 20group or other enrollment unit to effect refunds or charge 21additional premiums under the following terms and conditions:22        (i) the amount of, and other terms and conditions with 23    respect to, the refund or additional premium are set forth 24    in the group or enrollment unit contract agreed in advance 25    of the period for which a refund is to be paid or 26    additional premium is to be charged (which period shall   HB2628- 15 -LRB104 11962 BAB 22055 b1    not be less than one year); and2        (ii) the amount of the refund or additional premium 3    shall not exceed 20% of the Health Maintenance 4    Organization's profitable or unprofitable experience with 5    respect to the group or other enrollment unit for the 6    period (and, for purposes of a refund or additional 7    premium, the profitable or unprofitable experience shall 8    be calculated taking into account a pro rata share of the 9    Health Maintenance Organization's administrative and 10    marketing expenses, but shall not include any refund to be 11    made or additional premium to be paid pursuant to this 12    subsection (f)). The Health Maintenance Organization and 13    the group or enrollment unit may agree that the profitable 14    or unprofitable experience may be calculated taking into 15    account the refund period and the immediately preceding 2 16    plan years.17    The Health Maintenance Organization shall include a 18statement in the evidence of coverage issued to each enrollee 19describing the possibility of a refund or additional premium, 20and upon request of any group or enrollment unit, provide to 21the group or enrollment unit a description of the method used 22to calculate (1) the Health Maintenance Organization's 23profitable experience with respect to the group or enrollment 24unit and the resulting refund to the group or enrollment unit 25or (2) the Health Maintenance Organization's unprofitable 26experience with respect to the group or enrollment unit and   HB2628- 16 -LRB104 11962 BAB 22055 b1the resulting additional premium to be paid by the group or 2enrollment unit.3    In no event shall the Illinois Health Maintenance 4Organization Guaranty Association be liable to pay any 5contractual obligation of an insolvent organization to pay any 6refund authorized under this Section.7    (g) Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, 8if any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in 9accordance with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative 10Procedure Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint 11Committee on Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so 12adopted, for whatever reason, is unauthorized. 13(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-34, eff. 6-25-21; 14102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 151-1-22; 102-589, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, 16eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 17102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 181-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-901, eff. 7-1-22; 102-1093, 19eff. 1-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 20103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-123, eff. 1-1-24; 103-154, eff. 216-30-23; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, 22eff. 1-1-24; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 23103-618, eff. 1-1-25; 103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 103-656, eff. 241-1-25; 103-700, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, 25eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 26103-777, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff.   HB2628- 17 -LRB104 11962 BAB 22055 b11-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 9-26-24.) 2    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-808)3    Sec. 5-3. Insurance Code provisions. 4    (a) Health Maintenance Organizations shall be subject to 5the provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 6141.1, 141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 7152, 153, 154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.22a, 8155.49, 352c, 355.2, 355.3, 355.6, 355b, 355c, 356f, 356g, 9356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356z.2, 10356z.3a, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 11356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.17, 12356z.18, 356z.19, 356z.20, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.23, 356z.24, 13356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.28, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.31, 356z.32, 14356z.33, 356z.34, 356z.35, 356z.36, 356z.37, 356z.38, 356z.39, 15356z.40, 356z.40a, 356z.41, 356z.44, 356z.45, 356z.46, 16356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.49, 356z.50, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 17356z.55, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.58, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 18356z.62, 356z.63, 356z.64, 356z.65, 356z.66, 356z.67, 356z.68, 19356z.69, 356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.72, 356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 20356z.77, 356z.80, 364, 364.01, 364.3, 367.2, 367.2-5, 367i, 21368a, 368b, 368c, 368d, 368e, 370c, 370c.1, 401, 401.1, 402, 22403, 403A, 408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, and 444.1, paragraph (c) 23of subsection (2) of Section 367, and Articles IIA, VIII 1/2, 24XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, XXVI, and XXXIIB of the 25Illinois Insurance Code.  HB2628- 18 -LRB104 11962 BAB 22055 b1    (b) For purposes of the Illinois Insurance Code, except 2for Sections 444 and 444.1 and Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, 3Health Maintenance Organizations in the following categories 4are deemed to be "domestic companies":5        (1) a corporation authorized under the Dental Service 6    Plan Act or the Voluntary Health Services Plans Act;7        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of this 8    State; or9        (3) a corporation organized under the laws of another 10    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 11    of this State, except a corporation subject to 12    substantially the same requirements in its state of 13    organization as is a "domestic company" under Article VIII 14    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.15    (c) In considering the merger, consolidation, or other 16acquisition of control of a Health Maintenance Organization 17pursuant to Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code,18        (1) the Director shall give primary consideration to 19    the continuation of benefits to enrollees and the 20    financial conditions of the acquired Health Maintenance 21    Organization after the merger, consolidation, or other 22    acquisition of control takes effect;23        (2)(i) the criteria specified in subsection (1)(b) of 24    Section 131.8 of the Illinois Insurance Code shall not 25    apply and (ii) the Director, in making his determination 26    with respect to the merger, consolidation, or other   HB2628- 19 -LRB104 11962 BAB 22055 b1    acquisition of control, need not take into account the 2    effect on competition of the merger, consolidation, or 3    other acquisition of control;4        (3) the Director shall have the power to require the 5    following information:6            (A) certification by an independent actuary of the 7        adequacy of the reserves of the Health Maintenance 8        Organization sought to be acquired;9            (B) pro forma financial statements reflecting the 10        combined balance sheets of the acquiring company and 11        the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 12        acquired as of the end of the preceding year and as of 13        a date 90 days prior to the acquisition, as well as pro 14        forma financial statements reflecting projected 15        combined operation for a period of 2 years;16            (C) a pro forma business plan detailing an 17        acquiring party's plans with respect to the operation 18        of the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 19        acquired for a period of not less than 3 years; and20            (D) such other information as the Director shall 21        require.22    (d) The provisions of Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois 23Insurance Code and this Section 5-3 shall apply to the sale by 24any health maintenance organization of greater than 10% of its 25enrollee population (including, without limitation, the health 26maintenance organization's right, title, and interest in and   HB2628- 20 -LRB104 11962 BAB 22055 b1to its health care certificates).2    (e) In considering any management contract or service 3agreement subject to Section 141.1 of the Illinois Insurance 4Code, the Director (i) shall, in addition to the criteria 5specified in Section 141.2 of the Illinois Insurance Code, 6take into account the effect of the management contract or 7service agreement on the continuation of benefits to enrollees 8and the financial condition of the health maintenance 9organization to be managed or serviced, and (ii) need not take 10into account the effect of the management contract or service 11agreement on competition.12    (f) Except for small employer groups as defined in the 13Small Employer Rating, Renewability and Portability Health 14Insurance Act and except for medicare supplement policies as 15defined in Section 363 of the Illinois Insurance Code, a 16Health Maintenance Organization may by contract agree with a 17group or other enrollment unit to effect refunds or charge 18additional premiums under the following terms and conditions:19        (i) the amount of, and other terms and conditions with 20    respect to, the refund or additional premium are set forth 21    in the group or enrollment unit contract agreed in advance 22    of the period for which a refund is to be paid or 23    additional premium is to be charged (which period shall 24    not be less than one year); and25        (ii) the amount of the refund or additional premium 26    shall not exceed 20% of the Health Maintenance   HB2628- 21 -LRB104 11962 BAB 22055 b1    Organization's profitable or unprofitable experience with 2    respect to the group or other enrollment unit for the 3    period (and, for purposes of a refund or additional 4    premium, the profitable or unprofitable experience shall 5    be calculated taking into account a pro rata share of the 6    Health Maintenance Organization's administrative and 7    marketing expenses, but shall not include any refund to be 8    made or additional premium to be paid pursuant to this 9    subsection (f)). The Health Maintenance Organization and 10    the group or enrollment unit may agree that the profitable 11    or unprofitable experience may be calculated taking into 12    account the refund period and the immediately preceding 2 13    plan years.14    The Health Maintenance Organization shall include a 15statement in the evidence of coverage issued to each enrollee 16describing the possibility of a refund or additional premium, 17and upon request of any group or enrollment unit, provide to 18the group or enrollment unit a description of the method used 19to calculate (1) the Health Maintenance Organization's 20profitable experience with respect to the group or enrollment 21unit and the resulting refund to the group or enrollment unit 22or (2) the Health Maintenance Organization's unprofitable 23experience with respect to the group or enrollment unit and 24the resulting additional premium to be paid by the group or 25enrollment unit.26    In no event shall the Illinois Health Maintenance   HB2628- 22 -LRB104 11962 BAB 22055 b1Organization Guaranty Association be liable to pay any 2contractual obligation of an insolvent organization to pay any 3refund authorized under this Section.4    (g) Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, 5if any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in 6accordance with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative 7Procedure Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint 8Committee on Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so 9adopted, for whatever reason, is unauthorized. 10(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-34, eff. 6-25-21; 11102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 121-1-22; 102-589, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, 13eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 14102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 151-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-901, eff. 7-1-22; 102-1093, 16eff. 1-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 17103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-123, eff. 1-1-24; 103-154, eff. 186-30-23; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, 19eff. 1-1-24; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 20103-618, eff. 1-1-25; 103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 103-656, eff. 211-1-25; 103-700, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, 22eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 23103-777, eff. 8-2-24; 103-808, eff. 1-1-26; 103-914, eff. 241-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 2511-26-24.)   HB2628- 23 -LRB104 11962 BAB 22055 b1    Section 35. The Limited Health Service Organization Act is 2amended by changing Section 4003 as follows: 3    (215 ILCS 130/4003)  (from Ch. 73, par. 1504-3)4    Sec. 4003. Illinois Insurance Code provisions. Limited 5health service organizations shall be subject to the 6provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 141.1, 7141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 152, 153, 8154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.37, 155.49, 352c, 9355.2, 355.3, 355b, 355d, 356m, 356q, 356v, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 10356z.10, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.32, 11356z.33, 356z.41, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 12356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.61, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.71, 13356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 356z.80, 364.3, 368a, 401, 401.1, 14402, 403, 403A, 408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, and 444.1 and 15Articles IIA, VIII 1/2, XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, and 16XXVI of the Illinois Insurance Code. Nothing in this Section 17shall require a limited health care plan to cover any service 18that is not a limited health service. For purposes of the 19Illinois Insurance Code, except for Sections 444 and 444.1 and 20Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, limited health service 21organizations in the following categories are deemed to be 22domestic companies:23        (1) a corporation under the laws of this State; or24        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of another 25    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents   HB2628- 24 -LRB104 11962 BAB 22055 b1    of this State, except a corporation subject to 2    substantially the same requirements in its state of 3    organization as is a domestic company under Article VIII 4    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.5(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 6102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-731, eff. 71-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, 8eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 1-1-23; 9102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 101-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, 11eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 12103-656, eff. 1-1-25; 103-700, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, eff. 137-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-832, 14eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 15    Section 40. The Voluntary Health Services Plans Act is 16amended by changing Section 10 as follows: 17    (215 ILCS 165/10)  (from Ch. 32, par. 604)18    Sec. 10. Application of Insurance Code provisions. Health 19services plan corporations and all persons interested therein 20or dealing therewith shall be subject to the provisions of 21Articles IIA and XII 1/2 and Sections 3.1, 133, 136, 139, 140, 22143, 143.31, 143c, 149, 155.22a, 155.37, 354, 355.2, 355.3, 23355b, 355d, 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356r, 356t, 24356u, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356y, 356z.1, 356z.2,   HB2628- 25 -LRB104 11962 BAB 22055 b1356z.3a, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 2356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.18, 3356z.19, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 4356z.32, 356z.32a, 356z.33, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.46, 5356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 6356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.71, 7356z.72, 356z.74, 356z.75, 356z.77, 356z.80, 364.01, 364.3, 8367.2, 368a, 401, 401.1, 402, 403, 403A, 408, 408.2, and 412, 9and paragraphs (7) and (15) of Section 367 of the Illinois 10Insurance Code.11    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 12any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 13with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 14Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 15Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 16whatever reason, is unauthorized. 17(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 18102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, eff. 1910-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 102-804, 20eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 21102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-901, eff. 7-1-22; 102-1093, eff. 221-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 23eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 24103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-656, eff. 251-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, 26eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-832, eff. 1-1-25;   HB2628- 26 -LRB104 11962 BAB 22055 b1103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 21-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 3    Section 45. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 4changing Section 5-16.8 as follows: 5    (305 ILCS 5/5-16.8)6    Sec. 5-16.8. Required health benefits. The medical 7assistance program shall (i) provide the post-mastectomy care 8benefits required to be covered by a policy of accident and 9health insurance under Section 356t and the coverage required 10under Sections 356g.5, 356q, 356u, 356w, 356x, 356z.6, 11356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.34, 356z.35, 356z.46, 12356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.64, 13and 356z.67, and 356z.71, 356z.75 and 356z.80 of the Illinois 14Insurance Code, (ii) be subject to the provisions of Sections 15356z.19, 356z.44, 356z.49, 364.01, 370c, and 370c.1 of the 16Illinois Insurance Code, and (iii) be subject to the 17provisions of subsection (d-5) of Section 10 of the Network 18Adequacy and Transparency Act.19    The Department, by rule, shall adopt a model similar to 20the requirements of Section 356z.39 of the Illinois Insurance 21Code. 22    On and after July 1, 2012, the Department shall reduce any 23rate of reimbursement for services or other payments or alter 24any methodologies authorized by this Code to reduce any rate   HB2628- 27 -LRB104 11962 BAB 22055 b1of reimbursement for services or other payments in accordance 2with Section 5-5e. 3    To ensure full access to the benefits set forth in this 4Section, on and after January 1, 2016, the Department shall 5ensure that provider and hospital reimbursement for 6post-mastectomy care benefits required under this Section are 7no lower than the Medicare reimbursement rate. 8(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-144, eff. 1-1-22; 9102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-530, eff. 101-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, 11eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 1-1-23; 12102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 131-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-703, 14eff. 1-1-25; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 15revised 11-26-24.) 16    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding 17Section 8.49 as follows: 18    (30 ILCS 805/8.49 new)19    Sec. 8.49. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 208 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for 21the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory 22Act of the 104th General Assembly. 23    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes   HB2628- 28 -LRB104 11962 BAB 22055 b1changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 2that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 3represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 4not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 5made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 6Public Act. 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 81, 2027.